Utah statutes.
63M-4-301.   State energy policy.

(1)  It is the policy of the state that:

(a)  Utah have adequate, reliable, affordable, sustainable, and clean energy resources;

(b)  Utah will promote the development of:

(i)  nonrenewable energy resources, including natural gas, coal, oil, oil shale, and tar sands; and

(ii)  renewable energy resources, including geothermal, solar, wind, biomass, biodiesel, hydroelectric, and ethanol;

(c)  Utah will promote the study of nuclear power generation;

(d)  Utah will promote the development of resources and infrastructure sufficient to meet the state's growing demand, while contributing to the regional and national energy supply, thus reducing dependence on international energy sources;

(e)  Utah will allow market forces to drive prudent use of energy resources, although incentives and other methods may be used to ensure the state's optimal development and use of energy resources in the short- and long-term;

(f)  Utah will pursue energy conservation, energy efficiency, and environmental quality;

(g) (i)  state regulatory processes should be streamlined to balance economic costs with the level of review necessary to ensure protection of the state's various interests; and

(ii)  where federal action is required, Utah will encourage expedited federal action and will collaborate with federal agencies to expedite review;

(h)  Utah will maintain an environment that provides for stable consumer prices that are as low as possible while providing producers and suppliers a fair return on investment, recognizing that:

(i)  economic prosperity is linked to the availability, reliability, and affordability of consumer energy supplies; and

(ii)  investment will occur only when adequate financial returns can be realized; and

(i)  Utah will promote training and education programs focused on developing a comprehensive understanding of energy, including programs addressing:

(i)  energy conservation;

(ii)  energy efficiency;

(iii)  supply and demand; and

(iv)  energy related workforce development.

(2)  State agencies are encouraged to conduct agency activities consistent with Subsection (1).

(3)  A person may not file suit to challenge a state agency's action that is inconsistent with Subsection (1).

